Idaho, session 2026, H0649.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 22, Title 28, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 28-22-103, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
28-22-103. INTEREST RATE ALLOWED BY AGREEMENT. (1) Parties may agree
in writing to the payment of any rate of interest and fees that do not exceed
the greater of thirty percent (30%) or an amount that is ten (10) percentage
points per year above the prime rate published by the federal reserve sys-
tem in its statistical release, H.15 selected interest rates, for bank prime
loans dated three (3) business days prior to the execution of the agreement.
Interest must be allowed according to the terms of the agreement.
(2) A loan agreement that is not usurious when made is lawful for the
duration of the loan provided that the loan agreement is not substantially
changed. This subsection shall not apply to loan renewals.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a regulated
lender, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.